Utah statutes.
34-23-203.   Permitted occupations for minors 16 or older.

Minors 16 years of age or older may work:

(1)  in all occupations not declared hazardous; and

(2)  in occupations which involve the use of motor vehicles if the minor is licensed to operate the motor vehicle for  employment purposes under state law.

